en: Animals & Pet Supplies > Pet Supplies > Fish & Aquatic Supplies > Aquarium Temperature Controllers: Analog Temperature Controllers; Digital Temperature Controllers
el: Ζώα και προμήθειες για κατοικίδια ζώα > Προμήθειες για κατοικίδια ζώα > Προμήθειες για ψάρια & υδρόβια ζώα > Ελεγκτές θερμοκρασίας ενυδρείου: Αναλογικοί ελεγκτές θερμοκρασίας; Ψηφιακοί ελεγκτές θερμοκρασίας
lt-LT: Gyvūnai ir prekės naminiams gyvūnams > Prekės naminiams gyvūnams > Prekės žuvims ir kitiems vandens gyvūnams > Akvariumų temperatūros reguliatoriai: Analoginiai temperatūros reguliatoriai; Skaitmeniniai temperatūros reguliatoriai
ru: Животные и товары для питомцев > Товары для домашних животных > Товары для рыб и аквариумов > Терморегуляторы для аквариумов: Аналоговые терморегуляторы; Цифровые терморегуляторы
pt-BR: Animais e produtos para animais de estimação > Suprimentos para animais de estimação > Peixes e suprimentos aquáticos > Controladores de temperatura de aquários: Controladores analógicos de temperatura; Controladores digitais de temperatura
vi: Đồ dùng cho động vật & thú cưng > Đồ dùng cho thú cưng > Đồ dùng cho cá & động vật thủy sinh > Bộ kiểm soát nhiệt độ bể cá: Bộ kiểm soát nhiệt độ analog; Bộ kiểm soát nhiệt độ kỹ thuật số
tr: Hayvanlar ve Evcil Hayvan Ürünleri > Evcil Hayvan Ürünleri > Balık ve Su Malzemeleri > Akvaryum Sıcaklık Denetleme Aygıtları: Analog Sıcaklık Kontrol Cihazları; Dijital Sıcaklık Kontrol Cihazları
ro-RO: Animale și articole pentru animale de companie > Articole pentru animale de companie > Articole pentru pești și acvaristică > Regulatoare de temperatură pentru acvariu: Regulatoare de temperatură analogice; Regulatoare de temperatură digitale
sk-SK: Potreby pre zvieratá a domácich miláčikov > Potreby pre domácich miláčikov > Potreby pre rybička a akváriá > Ovládače teploty v akváriu: Analógové ovládače teploty; Digitálne ovládače teploty
nb: Produkter til dyr og husdyr > Husdyrprodukter > Fiske- og vannutstyr > Temperaturkontrollere for akvarier: Analoge temperaturkontrollere; Digitale temperaturkontrollere
hr-HR: Životinje i potrepštine za kućne ljubimce > Potrepštine za kućne ljubimce > Potrepštine za ribe i vodeni svijet > Regulatori temperature za akvarij: Analogni regulatori temperature; Digitalni regulatori temperature
hu: Állatok és kisállatkellékek > Háziállat-kellékek > Hal- és vízi kellékek > Akvárium-hőmérsékletszabályozók: Analóg hőmérséklet-szabályozók; Digitális hőmérséklet-szabályozók
pl: Zwierzęta i artykuły dla zwierząt > Artykuły dla zwierząt > Artykuły i akcesoria dla rybek > Regulatory temperatury do akwariów: Analogowe regulatory temperatury; Cyfrowe regulatory temperatury
ko: 동물/반려동물 용품 > 반려동물 용품 > 어류/수족관 용품 > 수족관 온도 조절기: 아날로그 온도 조절기; 디지털 온도 조절기
es: Productos para mascotas y animales > Productos para mascotas > Suministros para peces y acuarios > Controladores de temperatura de acuarios: Controladores de temperatura analógicos; Controladores de temperatura digitales
da: Dyr og tilbehør til kæledyr > Tilbehør til kæledyr > Fisk og vandforsyninger > Temperaturregulatorer til akvarier: Analoge temperaturregulatorer; Digitale temperaturregulatorer
th: อุปกรณ์สำหรับสัตว์และสัตว์เลี้ยง > อุปกรณ์สัตว์เลี้ยง > อุปกรณ์ทางน้ำและปลา > ตัวควบคุมอุณหภูมิตู้ปลา: ตัวควบคุมอุณหภูมิแบบอนาล็อก; ตัวควบคุมอุณหภูมิแบบดิจิตอล
zh-CN: 动物/宠物用品 > 宠物用品 > 鱼类和水族用品 > 水族箱温度控制器: 模拟温度控制器; 数字温度控制器
de: Tiere & Tierbedarf > Haustierbedarf > Zierfisch- Aquarien- und Teichbedarf > Temperaturregler für Aquarien: Analoge Temperaturregler; Digitale Temperaturregler
pt-PT: Artigos para animais e animais estimação > Artigos para animais > Artigos aquáticos e para peixes > Controladores de temperatura para aquários: Controladores de temperatura analógicos; Controladores de temperatura digitais
fr: Animaux et articles pour animaux de compagnie > Articles pour animaux de compagnie > Poissons et fournitures aquatiques > Commandes de température pour aquariums: Commandes de température analogiques; Commandes de température numériques
zh-TW: 動物/寵物補給品 > 寵物用品 > 魚和水族用品 > 水族箱溫控器: 類比水族箱溫控器; 數位水族箱溫控器
sl-SI: Živali in pripomočki za hišne ljubljenčke > Pripomočki za hišne ljubljenčke > Pripomočki za ribe in vodne živali > Regulatorji temperature v akvariju: Analogni regulatorji temperature; Digitalni regulatorji temperature
cs: Chovatelství > Potřeby pro domácí zvířata > Potřeby pro ryby a vodní živočichy > Regulátory teploty pro akvária: Analogové regulátory teploty; Digitální regulátory teploty
nl: Dieren > Benodigdheden voor huisdieren > Benodigdheden voor vissen en water > Temperatuurregelaars voor aquariums: Analoge temperatuurregelaars; Digitale temperatuurregelaars
fi: Eläinten ja lemmikkieläinten tarvikkeet > Lemmikkieläinten tarvikkeet > Kala- ja akvaariotarvikkeet > Akvaarion lämmönsäätimet: Analogiset lämmönsäätimet; Digitaaliset lämmönsäätimet
it: Articoli per animali > Animali domestici - Articoli > Forniture ittiche e acquatiche > Termostati per acquari: Termoregolatori analogici; Termoregolatori digitali
sv: Djur och tillbehör till husdjur > Tillbehör till husdjur > Fisk och vattentillbehör > Akarietermometer: Analoga temperaturregulatorer; Digitala temperaturregulatorer
bg-BG: Артикули за животни и домашни любимци > Артикули за домашни любимци > Риби и артикули за акваристика > Устройства за управление на температурата за аквариуми: Аналогови устройства; Дигитални устройства
ja: ペット・ペット用品 > ペット用品 > 魚・水産用品 > 水温管理機器: アナログ水温管理機器; デジタル水温管理機器